Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2198SS (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. 87 Section 1. Section 148E.9, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 148E.9 Accident and health insurance coverage. 3 This chapter shall not be construed to require accident and 4 health insurance coverage for acupuncture services under an 5 existing or future contract or policy for insurance issued or 6 issued for delivery in this state, unless otherwise provided by 7 the contract or policy , or as required by section 514C.36 . 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 514C.37 Acupuncture ââ coverage. 9 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 10 requires: 11 a. âAcupunctureâ means the same as defined in section 12 148E.1. 13 b. âAcupuncturistâ means a person who is engaged in the 14 practice of acupuncture and who is licensed pursuant to section 15 148E.2. 16 c. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, copayment, 17 coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket expense 18 obligation imposed on a covered person by a policy, contract, 19 or plan providing for third-party payment or prepayment of 20 health or medical expenses. 21 d. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, or 22 other person participating in a policy, contract, or plan that 23 provides for third-party payment or prepayment of health or 24 medical expenses. 25 e. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 26 514J.102. 27 f. âPractice of acupunctureâ means the same as defined in 28 section 148E.1. 29 2. a. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment 30 requirements of section 514C.6, a health carrier that offers 31 individual, group, or small group contracts, policies, or 32 plans in this state that provide for third-party payment or 33 prepayment of health or medical expenses shall offer coverage 34 for acupuncture performed by an acupuncturist. 35 -1- LSB 2198SS (2) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 87 b. Coverage required under this section shall not be less 1 favorable than coverage a health carrier offers for general 2 physical illness. 3 c. Cost-sharing requirements imposed for coverage 4 required under this section shall not be less favorable than 5 cost-sharing requirements imposed by a health carrier for 6 general physical illness. 7 3. a. This section shall apply to the following classes 8 of third-party payment provider contracts, policies, or plans 9 delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this 10 state on or after January 1, 2026: 11 (1) Individual or group accident and sickness insurance 12 providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis. 13 (2) An individual or group hospital or medical service 14 contract issued pursuant to chapter 509, 514, or 514A. 15 (3) An individual or group health maintenance organization 16 contract regulated under chapter 514B. 17 (4) A plan established for public employees pursuant to 18 chapter 509A. 19 b. This section shall not apply to accident-only, 20 specified disease, short-term hospital or medical, hospital 21 confinement indemnity, credit, dental, vision, Medicare 22 supplement, long-term care, basic hospital and medical-surgical 23 expense coverage as defined by the commissioner, disability 24 income insurance coverage, coverage issued as a supplement 25 to liability insurance, workersâ compensation or similar 26 insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance. 27 4. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 28 chapter 17A to administer this section. 29